Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 13 Sentence and Imprisonment

Cross references. —

As to conduct of jails, see art. 1, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to establishment of penal institutions, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to sentencing under Criminal Code, see chapter 10 of title 6.

As to state penal institutions, see chapters 1 through 4 of title 25.

As to procedure relating to sentence and judgment, see Rule 54 et seq., W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

United States Parole Commission Guidelines for federal prisoners, 61 ALR Fed 135.